Washington statutes.
RCW 9.62.020

Instituting suit in name of another.

Every person who shall institute or prosecute any action or other proceeding in the name of another, without his or her consent and contrary to law, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 317; 1909 c 249 s 124; RRS s 2376.]